District of Columbia statutes.
34-2403.01

Prevention of water waste.

In order to prevent unnecessary waste of Potomac water, and in order to more fully enforce the laws in relation to the distribution of the same, the Chief of Engineers is authorized, after giving notice, to shut off the water when such notice shall be disregarded from any places where a waste of water is occurring.

R.S., D.C., § 214
1981 Ed., § 43-1509.
1973 Ed., § 43-1507.